Wyoming, session 2025, HB0144.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 22-4-101(d), 22-16-101 and
22-29-114(e)(intro) are amended to read:

22-4-101. Application; composition, election and
qualifications of county central committees; certificate of
election.

(d) No later than forty-five (45) days after the date
of the primary election, the county canvassing board or a
HB0144

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0429
canvassing board appointed by the county clerk consisting
of two (2) electors and the county clerk, shall provide to
each county chairman the certified election results for
precinct committeemen and committeewomen and a list of
persons who received write-in votes for precinct
committeemen or committeewomen.

22-16-101. County canvassing board; compensation.

The county canvassing board is the county clerk and two (2)
electors of different political parties resident in who are
residents of the county, appointed with one (1) elector
selected by the county clerk central committee of each of
the two (2) largest major political parties in the county.
If there are not two (2) major political parties in the
county, or if a county central committee fails to select an
elector for the county canvassing board under this section,
the county clerk may appoint any unfilled positions on the
county canvassing board, provided that the two (2) electors
shall be of different political parties. The two (2)
electors shall receive the same compensation as election
judges. All canvassing board members shall take an oath of
office.
HB0144

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0429

22-29-114. Election procedures for elections other
than mail ballot elections; canvass, recount and contests.

(e) Any special district election conducted by the
county clerk shall be canvassed by the county canvassing
board. or a canvassing board appointed by the county clerk,
consisting of two (2) electors and the county clerk. If
more than one (1) county is involved, the election shall be
canvassed in accordance with chapter 16 of the Wyoming
Election Code of 1973, as amended, by a canvassing board
drawn from the membership of the appropriate county
canvassing boards appointed by the appropriate county
commissioners. The commissioners shall notify the county
clerks of the canvassing board appointments. Any special
district election not conducted by a county clerk shall be
canvassed by a special district canvassing board. The
special district canvassing board shall consist of the
district secretary and two (2) electors appointed by the
district board. Any canvass shall be conducted in
accordance with chapter 16 of the Wyoming Election Code of
1973, as amended. The canvass shall be conducted within
seven (7) business days of the election. The canvassing
HB0144

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0429
board shall have the authority to call for a special
election in accordance with W.S. 22-16-122. The canvassing
board shall:

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0144